Florida, session 2026, HB1519.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
27
28 Section 1. Section 406.139, Florida Statutes, is created
29 to read:
30 406.139 Autopsy of a suspected violent offender.—
31 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
32 (a) "Intoxicating substance" means any alcoholic beverage,
33 controlled substance controlled under chapter 893, or chemical
34 substance set forth in s. 877.111.
35 (b) "Psychotropic drug" means any drug prescribed to
36 affect an individual's mental state, including, but not limited
37 to, antidepressants, antipsychotics, mood stabilizers, and
38 antianxiety medications.
39 (c) "Violent offender" means any person who is suspected
40 by law enforcement of engaging in unprovoked violence that
41 results in, or is likely to result in, the death or serious
42 bodily injury of another.
43 (2) CONSULTATION; TOXICOLOGY SCREENING.—If a medical
44 examiner's office performs an autopsy on a decedent who is a
45 violent offender, the medical examiner must do all of the
46 following:
47 (a)1. Make reasonable efforts to determine the identity of
48 any treating mental health professional or primary care
49 physician of the decedent; and
50 2. Consult such individuals, if known and available, to
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
51 obtain information and records regarding the decedent's history
52 of psychotropic drug use, including any prescribed or
53 discontinued medications.
54 (b) Order and perform a toxicology screening on the
55 decedent to determine whether psychotropic drugs or intoxicating
56 substances are present in the decedent's body.
57 (3) AUTOPSY REPORT; NOTIFICATION.—
58 (a) All findings under subsection (2) must be documented
59 and included in the final autopsy report, along with any
60 available corroborating information.
61 (b)1. Any findings relating to the use of intoxicating
62 substances or psychotropic drugs must be reported to the
63 Department of Law Enforcement.
64 2. Any findings relating to the use of psychotropic drugs
65 and, if known, the prescribing facility, must be reported to the
66 Department of Health and the Agency for Health Care
67 Administration.
68 Section 2. Present subsections (8) through (20) of section
69 456.057, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (9)
70 through (21), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to
71 that section, to read:
72 456.057 Ownership and control of patient records; report
73 or copies of records to be furnished; disclosure of
74 information.—
75 (8) Notwithstanding any other law, records must be
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
76 furnished to a law enforcement agency as defined in s. 914.28
77 for the purpose of investigating a violent offender as defined
78 in s. 406.139, provided:
79 (a) Such release is limited to only those records that
80 confirm whether the suspected person was ever treated with
81 psychotropic drugs as defined in s. 406.139;
82 (b) The records reasonably relate to such treatment; and
83 (c) The law enforcement agency requests such records.
84 Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section
85 1006.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
86 1006.07 District school board duties relating to student
87 discipline and school safety.—The district school board shall
88 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the
89 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper
90 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the
91 welfare of students, including:
92 (6) SAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.—Each district
93 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures
94 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the
95 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior
96 poses a threat to the safety of the school community.
97 (a) School safety specialist.—Each district school
98 superintendent shall designate a school safety specialist for
99 the district. The school safety specialist must be a school
100 administrator employed by the school district or a law
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
101 enforcement officer employed by the sheriff's office located in
102 the school district. Any school safety specialist designated
103 from the sheriff's office must first be authorized and approved
104 by the sheriff employing the law enforcement officer. Any school
105 safety specialist designated from the sheriff's office remains
106 the employee of the office for purposes of compensation,
107 insurance, workers' compensation, and other benefits authorized
108 by law for a law enforcement officer employed by the sheriff's
109 office. The sheriff and the school superintendent may determine
110 by agreement the reimbursement for such costs, or may share the
111 costs, associated with employment of the law enforcement officer
112 as a school safety specialist. The school safety specialist must
113 earn a certificate of completion of the school safety specialist
114 training provided by the Office of Safe Schools within 1 year
115 after appointment and is responsible for the supervision and
116 oversight for all school safety and security personnel,
117 policies, and procedures in the school district. The school
118 safety specialist, or his or her designee, shall:
119 1. In conjunction with the district school superintendent,
120 annually review school district policies and procedures for
121 compliance with state law and rules, including the district's
122 timely and accurate submission of school environmental safety
123 incident reports to the department pursuant to s. 1001.212(8).
124 At least quarterly, the school safety specialist must report to
125 the district school superintendent and the district school board
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
126 any noncompliance by the school district with laws or rules
127 regarding school safety.
128 2. Provide the necessary training and resources to
129 students and school district staff in matters relating to youth
130 mental health awareness and assistance; emergency procedures,
131 including active shooter training; and school safety and
132 security.
133 3. Provide the necessary training and resources to school
134 district staff in matters relating to the adverse effects of
135 psychotropic drugs and intoxicating substances as those terms
136 are defined in s. 406.139, including the irrational, violent, or
137 suicidal behavior that may be demonstrated by students under the
138 influence of such drugs or substances. The training must include
139 instruction on how such staff can identify and safely interact
140 with students who may be under the influence of such drugs or
141 substances, including de-escalation techniques to ensure student
142 and staff safety.
143 4. Serve as the school district liaison with local public
144 safety agencies and national, state, and community agencies and
145 organizations in matters of school safety and security.
146 5.4. In collaboration with the appropriate public safety
147 agencies, as that term is defined in s. 365.171, by October 1 of
148 each year, conduct a school security risk assessment at each
149 public school using the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool
150 developed by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s.
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
151 1006.1493. Based on the assessment findings, the district's
152 school safety specialist shall provide recommendations to the
153 district school superintendent and the district school board
154 which identify strategies and activities that the district
155 school board should implement in order to address the findings
156 and improve school safety and security. Each district school
157 board must receive such findings and the school safety
158 specialist's recommendations at a publicly noticed district
159 school board meeting to provide the public an opportunity to
160 hear the district school board members discuss and take action
161 on the findings and recommendations. Each school safety
162 specialist, through the district school superintendent, shall
163 report such findings and school board action to the Office of
164 Safe Schools within 30 days after the district school board
165 meeting.
166 6.5. Conduct annual unannounced inspections, using the
167 form adopted by the Office of Safe Schools pursuant to s.
168 1001.212(13), of all public schools, including charter schools,
169 while school is in session and investigate reports of
170 noncompliance with school safety requirements.
171 7.6. Report violations of paragraph (f) by administrative
172 personnel and instructional personnel to the district school
173 superintendent or charter school administrator, as applicable.
174 Section 4. Subsection (6) of section 1006.12, Florida
175 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
176 1006.12 Safe-school officers at each public school.—For
177 the protection and safety of school personnel, property,
178 students, and visitors, each district school board and school
179 district superintendent shall partner with law enforcement
180 agencies or security agencies to establish or assign one or more
181 safe-school officers at each school facility within the
182 district, including charter schools. A district school board
183 must collaborate with charter school governing boards to
184 facilitate charter school access to all safe-school officer
185 options available under this section. The school district may
186 implement any combination of the options in subsections (1)-(4)
187 to best meet the needs of the school district and charter
188 schools.
189 (6) CRISIS INTERVENTION TRAINING; SUBSTANCE USE TRAINING.—
190 (a) Each safe-school officer who is also a sworn law
191 enforcement officer shall complete mental health crisis
192 intervention training using a curriculum developed by a national
193 organization with expertise in mental health crisis
194 intervention. The training must improve the officer's knowledge
195 and skills as a first responder to incidents involving students
196 with emotional disturbance or mental illness, including de-
197 escalation skills to ensure student and officer safety.
198 (b) Each safe-school officer shall complete training on
199 the adverse effects of psychotropic drugs and intoxicating
200 substances as those terms are defined in s. 406.139, including
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
201 the irrational, violent, or suicidal behavior that may be
202 demonstrated by students under the influence of such drugs or
203 substances. The training must include instruction on how such a
204 safe-school officer can identify and safely interact with
205 students who may be under the influence of such drugs or
206 substances, including de-escalation techniques to ensure student
207 and officer safety.
208
209 If a district school board, through its adopted policies,
210 procedures, or actions, denies a charter school access to any
211 safe-school officer options pursuant to this section, the school
212 district must assign a school resource officer or school safety
213 officer to the charter school. Under such circumstances, the
214 charter school's share of the costs of the school resource
215 officer or school safety officer may not exceed the safe school
216 allocation funds provided to the charter school pursuant to s.
217 1011.62(12) and shall be retained by the school district.
218 Section 5. Paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of section
219 381.028, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
220 381.028 Adverse medical incidents.—
221 (7) PRODUCTION OF RECORDS.—
222 (c)1. Fees charged by a health care facility for copies of
223 records requested by a patient under s. 25, Art. X of the State
224 Constitution may not exceed the reasonable and actual cost of
225 complying with the request, including a reasonable charge for
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1519 2026
226 the staff time necessary to search for records and prevent the
227 disclosure of the identity of any patient involved in the
228 adverse medical incident through redaction or other means as
229 required by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
230 Act of 1996 or its implementing regulations. The health care
231 facility may require payment, in full or in part, before acting
232 on the records request.
233 2. Fees charged by a health care provider for copies of
234 records requested by a patient under s. 25, Art. X of the State
235 Constitution may not exceed the amount established under s.
236 456.057(18) s. 456.057(17), which may include a reasonable
237 charge for the staff time necessary to prevent the disclosure of
238 the identity of any patient involved in the adverse medical
239 incident through redaction or other means as required by the
240 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 or
241 its implementing regulations. The health care provider may
242 require payment, in full or in part, before acting on the
243 records request.
244 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1519-00